North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 12A. Human Service Transportation.

§ 62-289.1.
Short title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Act to Remove Barriers to Coordinating Human Service and Volunteer Transportation”.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 62-289.2.
Purpose.

In order to promote improved transportation for the elderly, handicapped and residents of rural areas and small towns through an expanded and coordinated transportation network, it is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize human service transportation and volunteer transportation as separate but contributing components of the North Carolina transportation system. Further, it is the intent of the General Assembly to remove barriers to low cost human service transportation.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 62-289.3.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Human service agency. — Any charitable or governmental agency including, but not limited to: county departments of social services, area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse authorities, local health departments, councils on aging, community action agencies, sheltered workshops, group homes, and State residential institutions.

Human service transportation. — Motor vehicle transportation provided on a nonprofit basis by a human service agency for the purpose of transporting clients or recipients in connection with programs sponsored by the agency. “Human service transportation” also means motor vehicle transportation provided by for-profit persons under exclusive contract with a human service agency for the transportation of clients or recipients, and such provider shall also qualify as a human service agency for the purpose of motor vehicle registration during the term of the contract. The motor vehicle may be owned, leased, borrowed, or contracted for use by or from the human service agency.

Nonprofit. — As applied to human service transportation, means motor vehicle transportation provided at cost.

Person. — An individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, or other legal entity.

Volunteer transportation. — Motor vehicle transportation provided by any person under the direction, sponsorship, or supervision of a human service agency. The person may receive an allowance to defray the actual cost of operating the vehicle but shall not receive any other compensation.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1; 1987, c. 407; 2018-47, s. 6(b).

§ 62-289.4.
Classification of transportation.

The forms of transportation defined in G.S. 62-289.3(2) and (5) shall be classified as “human service transportation” and “volunteer transportation” for purposes of regulation, insurance, and general administration.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 62-289.5.
Inapplicable laws and regulations.

Human services transportation and volunteer transportation shall not be considered as for-hire transportation, commercial transportation or motor carriers, as defined by G.S. 62-3(17). Such transportation shall not be subject to regulation as motor carriers under

G.S. 62-261

.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 62-289.6.
Insurance for volunteers.

Human service agencies are authorized to purchase insurance to cover persons who provide volunteer transportation.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 62-289.7.
Municipal licenses and taxes.

No county, city, town, municipal corporation or other unit of local government may impose a special tax on or require a special license for human service transportation or volunteer transportation other than that customarily used or imposed on private passenger automobiles unless the tax or license is provided for by a statute, ordinance, or regulation specifically addressing human service transportation or volunteer transportation.

History.

1981, c. 792, s. 1.